Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB931.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Proof of Citizenship for Receipt of Public Benefits Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Access device." The Pennsylvania ACCESS card or Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) card."Affidavit." An unsworn statement that is made subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities)."Agency." A government agency.1234567891011121314151617 "Authorized cardholder." An individual to whom an access device has been issued for the purpose of accessing:(1) public benefits of which the individual is a recipient;(2) public benefits on behalf of a minor who is a recipient of public benefits;(3) public benefits on behalf of a recipient of public benefits who is unable to use an access device because of a disability; or(4) public benefits on behalf of a household, so long as the individual is an adult member of the household and has been authorized by a recipient of public benefits to access the benefits."Person." An individual."Public benefits."(1) Any of the following:(i) A grant, contract or loan provided by an agency of the Commonwealth or a local government.(ii) A welfare, health, disability, public or assisted housing, postsecondary education, food assistance, unemployment benefit or other similar benefit for which payments or assistance are provided to an individual, household or family eligibility unit by an agency of the Commonwealth or a local government.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) Benefits listed under section 411(b) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193, 110 Stat. 2105).(ii) A contract for a nonimmigrant whose visa for 20250HB0931PN0993 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entry is related to employment in the United States or to a citizen of a freely associated state, if section 141 of the applicable compact of free association approved under the Compact of Free Association Act of 1985 (Public Law 99-239, 99 Stat. 1770) or the Joint Resolution to approve the "Compact of Free Association" between the United States and the Government of Palau, and for other purposes (Public Law 99-658, 100 Stat. 3672) or a successor provision, is in effect.(iii) Benefits for an alien who as a work-authorized nonimmigrant or as an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence under the Immigration and Nationality Act (66 Stat. 163, 8 U.S.C. § 1101 et seq.) qualified for benefits and for whom the United States under reciprocal treaty agreements is required to pay benefits, as determined by the Secretary of State, after consultation with the Attorney General of the United States.(iv) A Federal public benefit under section 401(c) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996.(v) Nutrition programs enumerated in section 742(b)(2) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996.(vi) Programs providing assistance in the form of food or food vouchers, including the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children.(vii) Protective services provided under the act of November 6, 1987 (P.L.381, No.79), known as the Older Adults Protective Services Act, and the act of October 7, 2010 (P.L.484, No.70), known as the Adult Protective 20250HB0931PN0993 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Services Act.(viii) Services provided to a victim of a severe form of trafficking in persons as defined under 22 U.S.C. § 7105(b)(1)(C) (relating to protection and assistance for victims of trafficking).(ix) Unemployment benefits for an alien who has obtained employment authorization from the Department of Homeland Security."Public money." The term includes the cost of arrest, prosecution, incarceration or detainment of an unauthorized alien and any related expenses."Unauthorized alien." An alien who is not:(1) An alien who is lawfully admitted for permanent residence under the Immigration and Nationality Act.(2) An alien who is granted asylum under section 208 of the Immigration and Nationality Act.(3) A refugee who is admitted to the United States under section 208 of the Immigration and Nationality Act.(4) A nonimmigrant under the Immigration and Nationality Act.(5) An alien who is granted conditional entry under section 203(a)(7) of the Immigration and Nationality Act as in effect prior to April 1, 1980.Section 3. Identification and eligibility.(a) Requirements.--A person who applies directly to an agency for public benefits shall provide proof of identification and proof of eligibility in accordance with this section.(b) Proof of identification.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person subject to subsection (a) must provide, in person, by mail or 20250HB0931PN0993 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by electronic means, one of the following forms of identification to the agency:(i) A valid driver's license or identification card issued by the Department of Transportation.(ii) A valid identification card issued by an agency of the Commonwealth.(iii) A valid identification card issued by the United States Government, a state government or the Government of Canada.(iv) A valid United States passport.(v) A document from an agency of the United States or a state National Guard establishing that the person is a current member of or a veteran of the United States Armed Forces or National Guard.(vi) A form of identification as listed in United States Attorney General's Order Number 2129-97 Interim Guidance on Verification of Citizenship, Qualified Alien Status and Eligibility Under Title IV of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193, 110 Stat. 2105), as issued by the Department of Justice at 62 Fed. Reg. 61344 (Nov. 17, 1997) or a subsequent version of that Attorney General's order.(2) If the person does not possess a form of identification listed in paragraph (1), the person must provide, in person, by mail or by electronic means, an affidavit stating that the person signing the affidavit is the person who is applying for public benefits and that the person does not possess a form of identification listed in paragraph (1).20250HB0931PN0993 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Proof of eligibility.--To demonstrate eligibility, a person subject to subsection (a) must provide, in person, by mail or by electronic means, one of the following to the agency:(1) An affidavit stating that the person is a United States citizen.(2) An affidavit stating that the person is eligible for State or local benefits under section 411(a) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996.(d) Recordkeeping of affidavit.--The agency shall maintain the affidavit required under subsections (b) and (c) in accordance with the applicable records retention schedule.(e) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to:(1) A person under 18 years of age.(2) A person currently receiving Supplemental Security Income or Social Security disability income.(3) A person entitled to or enrolled in Medicare Part A or Part B, or both.(4) A person applying for public benefits on behalf of a person under 18 years of age.(5) A person whose citizenship has been verified under section 1902(ee) of the Social Security Act (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(ee)).(6) A person who declares by affidavit that, because of domestic violence, the person does not currently possess any of the identification documents listed in subsection (a)(1). The domestic violence shall be verified using state standards developed under section 402(a)(7) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996.20250HB0931PN0993 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Verification through Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlement Program.(a) Duties.--An agency that administers public benefits shall verify, through the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program operated by the Department of Homeland Security or a successor program designated by the Department of Homeland Security, that each noncitizen applicant who has executed an affidavit under section 3(c)(2) is eligible for State or local benefits under section 411(a) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193, 110 Stat. 2105).(b) Presumption of eligibility by affidavit.--Until verification of eligibility is made, the affidavit executed under section 3(c)(2) may be presumed to be proof that the person is eligible for State or local benefits under section 411(a) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Reconciliation Act of 1996.Section 5. Prohibiting issuance of access devices to persons who are not authorized cardholders.An agency may not issue an access device to a person who is not eligible to be an authorized cardholder.Section 6. Possession or use of access device.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person:(1) is not an authorized cardholder and possesses or uses an access device; or(2) possesses or uses an access device that was not issued to the person.(b) Separate offenses.--Each time a person possesses or uses an access device in violation of subsection (a) constitutes a 20250HB0931PN0993 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 separate offense under this section.(c) Grading.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits a felony of the third degree.Section 7. False statements.A person who knowingly and willfully makes a false, fictitious or fraudulent statement of representation in an affidavit executed under section 3 may be subject to prosecution under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).Section 8. Nondiscrimination.This act shall be enforced without regard to race, religion, gender, ethnicity or national origin.Section 9. Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program.(a) Reporting.--If an agency encounters errors and significant delays when using the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program under section 4, the agency shall report the errors and delays to the Department of Homeland Security and to the Attorney General.(b) Monitoring.--The Attorney General shall monitor the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program and the program's verification application for errors and significant delays and report yearly on the errors and significant delays to ensure that the application of the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program is not wrongfully denying benefits to legal residents of this Commonwealth.Section 10. Notification to the Governor's Office of Administration and posting on PennWATCH.(a) Duties.--An agency, upon determining that public money has been expended on or public benefits provided to an 20250HB0931PN0993 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unauthorized alien, shall prepare an invoice listing the cost of the expenditures or benefits. The agency shall transmit the invoice along with any identifying information concerning the unauthorized alien to the Governor's Office of Administration for inclusion in the publicly accessible Internet website known as PennWATCH.(b) Access.--The Governor's Office of Administration shall provide access to the invoices under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 11. Applicability.(a) Public benefits.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), this act shall apply to applications for public benefits and renewal of public benefits filed directly with an agency after the effective date of this section.(b) Federal funding and law.--This act shall not apply to applications for public benefits and renewal of public benefits filed directly with an agency if compliance with this act would lead to loss of Federal funding or be in conflict with any Federal law.Section 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0931PN0993 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021